Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20133-304
Joint
airport zoning board; airport
zoning regulation; filing.

If an airport is owned or controlled by a political
subdivision and any airport hazard area appertaining to such airport is located
outside of the political subdivision's zoning
jurisdiction, the political subdivision owning or controlling
the airport and the political subdivision or
political subdivisions within whose zoning jurisdiction the
airport hazard area or areas are located may,
by ordinance or resolution duly adopted, create a joint airport zoning board,
which board shall have the same power to adopt, by resolution approved by a majority of the board, airport
zoning regulations applicable to an airport hazard area as that vested
by section 3-303 in any political subdivision
within whose zoning
jurisdiction such area is located. Any airport zoning regulation, or any
amendment thereto, adopted by a joint airport zoning board shall be filed
with the official or administrative agency responsible for the enforcement
of zoning regulations in each of the political subdivisions participating
in the creation of the joint airport zoning board and shall be enforced as
provided in section 3-319.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 3(2), p. 683;

Laws 1961, c. 9, § 2, p. 96;

Laws 1984, LB 837, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB512, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 4.